Utah statutes.
62A-7-701.   Community-based programs.

(1)  The division shall operate residential and nonresidential community-based  programs to provide care, treatment, and supervision for paroled youth offenders and for youth offenders committed to the division by juvenile courts.

(2)  The division shall adopt, with the approval of the board, minimum standards for the organization and operation of community-based corrections programs for youth offenders.  

(3)  The division shall place youth offenders committed to it for community-based programs in the most appropriate program based upon the division's evaluation of the youth offender's needs and the division's available resources.

